Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 360.55, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcasts. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast" or "ADS-B" means aviation surveillance technology that uses a combination of an aircraft's positioning system, aircraft avionics, and ground infrastructure to create a surveillance interface between an aircraft and air traffic control or other aircraft, and includes ADS-B In and ADS-B Out. new text end new text begin (b) The state, a political subdivision, and a private entity must not use information broadcast or collected by an automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast system as a means to calculate, generate, or collect fees from an aircraft owner or the operator of an aircraft in the air space over this state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end